Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.163

Testing by department—Ensuring enforcement—Issuance of seal of approval—Exception.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and *RCW 19.94.190(1)(d), the department shall test and inspect each biennium a sufficient number of weighing and measuring instruments and devices to ensure that the provisions of this chapter are enforced.

(2) The department may issue an official seal of approval for each weighing or measuring instrument or device that has been tested and inspected and found to be correct.

(3) Except as provided in RCW 19.94.216, this section does not apply to weighing or measuring instruments or devices located in an area of the state that is within a city that has a city sealer and a weights and measures program pursuant to RCW 19.94.280 unless the city sealer does not possess the equipment necessary to test and inspect the weighing or measuring instrument or device.

[ 1995 c 355 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.94.190 was amended by 2019 c 96 s 4, changing subsection (1)(d) to subsection (4)(d).

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.